North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 18A. Contracts of Minors Borrowing for Higher Education; Scholarship Revocation.

§ 116-174.1.
Minors authorized to borrow for higher education; interest; requirements of loans.

All minors in North Carolina of the age of 17 years and upwards shall have full power and authority to enter into written contracts of indebtedness, at a rate of interest not exceeding the contract rate authorized in Chapter 24 of the General Statutes, with persons and educational institutions or with firms and corporations licensed to do business in North Carolina and to execute notes evidencing such indebtedness. Such loans shall be:

Unsecured by the conveyance of any property as security, whether real, personal or mixed;

For the sole purpose of borrowing money to obtain post-secondary education at an accredited college, university, junior college, community college, business or trade school provided, however, that none of the proceeds of such loans shall be used to pay for any correspondence courses;

The proceeds of any loan shall be disbursed either directly to the educational institution for the benefit of the borrower or jointly to the borrower and the educational institution.

History.

1963, c. 780; 1969, c. 1073; 1987, c. 564, s. 36.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Contracts of Minors Viewed from the Perspective of Fair Exchange,” see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 517 (1972).

§ 116-174.2.
Grounds for revocation of scholarships.

Any student regularly registered and enrolled as an undergraduate, graduate, or professional student in a state-supported college, university or community college who shall be convicted, enter a plea of guilty or nolo contendere upon an indictment or charge for engaging in a riot, inciting a riot, unlawful demonstration or assembly, seizing or occupying a building or facility, sitting down in buildings they have seized, or lying down in entrances to buildings or any facilities, or on the campus of any college, university, or community college, or any student, whether an undergraduate, graduate or professional student who shall forfeit an appearance bond on an indictment or charge of any of the above-named offenses, shall have revoked and withdrawn from his benefit all state-supported scholarships or any State funds granted to him for educational assistance. It shall be the duty of all persons or officials having charge of and authority over the granting of state-supported scholarships or any other form of financial assistance to immediately revoke and withdraw same in the event and upon the happening of any of the conditions or matters above enumerated; provided, however, that in subsequent academic terms any such student shall be eligible to be considered for and to be granted financial assistance from State funds.

History.

1969, c. 1019.